src/fst/morphology/incoming/resplit/noun_prefixes.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_PREFIXES
NOUN_INDEP_PREFIXES ;
NOUN_SHORT_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON NOUN_INDEP_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit%<    NEG_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit%<    NEG_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.OT@:@P.person.OT@ot%<     NEG_PREFIXES ;
@P.person.NULL@0                    NEG_PREFIXES ;

!LEXICON PRE_INDEP_FLAG
!@R.pos.NOUN@ PREVERBS ;
!@R.pos.VERB@ PREVERBS ;

LEXICON NOUN_SHORT_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@n%<    DEP_STEMS ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@k%<    DEP_STEMS ;
@P.person.OT@:@P.person.OT@w%<    DEP_STEMS ;
